HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.aff
SFX o Y 54
SFX o а и а 
SFX o ола іл ола 
SFX o оба іб оба 
SFX o ода ід ода 
SFX o ога іг ога 
SFX o га іг рга 
SFX o оха іх оха 
SFX o ока ік ока 
SFX o она ін она 
SFX o опа іп опа 
SFX o ора ір ора 
SFX o ра ер тра 
SFX o ра ор [^от]ра 
SFX o оса іс оса 
SFX o ота іт ота 
SFX o ва ов [^о]ва 
SFX o ова ів [о]ва 
SFX o оза із [^ь]оза 
SFX o ьоза із ьоза 
SFX o еза із еза 
SFX o а ів жа 
SFX o а ів жа 
SFX o а ей ша 
SFX o ійня оєнь ійня 
SFX o 0 м [ая] 
SFX o 0 ми [ая] 
SFX o 0 х [ая] 
SFX o о а о 
SFX o ово ів ово 
SFX o ото іт ото 
SFX o ето іт ето 
SFX o оло іл оло 
SFX o ело іл ело 
SFX o есо іс есо 
SFX o осо іс осо 
SFX o но он [кг]но 
SFX o ло ол [кз]ло 
SFX o ко ок [ь]ко 
SFX o ло ел [пбдт]ло 
SFX o но ен [дтрв]но 
SFX o ро ер [дб]ро 
SFX o мо ем рмо 
SFX o мо ом смо 
SFX o о ам о 
SFX o о ами о 
SFX o о ах о 
SFX o г зі г 
SFX o ґ зі ґ 
SFX o к ці к 
SFX o х сі х 
SFX o и 0 и 
SFX o и ам и 
SFX o и ами и 
SFX o и ах и 
SFX d Y 37
SFX d а о [^жчшщ]а 
SFX d а е [жчщ]а 
SFX d я е [лнц]я 
SFX d я є ['ьіеиаоу]я 
SFX d ір оре [^л]ір 
SFX d ір ьоре лір 
SFX d ін оне ін 
SFX d іг оже [^р]іг 
SFX d іг еже ріг 
SFX d ід оде [^л]ід 
SFX d ід ьоде [^пг]лід 
SFX d ід оде [пг]лід 
SFX d іб обе іб 
SFX d іп опе іп 
SFX d івш овше івш 
SFX d ізд озде ізд 
SFX d іл оле іл 
SFX d ів ове ів 
SFX d їв єве їв 
SFX d ік оче ік 
SFX d іск осче іск 
SFX d іст осте іст 
SFX d іт оте [^л]іт 
SFX d іт ьоте [^п]літ 
SFX d іт оте [п]літ 
SFX d із озе із 
SFX d іж оже [^тб]іж 
SFX d іж оже е[тб]іж 
SFX d іж еже [^е][тб]іж 
SFX d ет те ет 
SFX d інь оне [к]інь 
SFX d інь ене [^ксв]інь 
SFX d інь ене [^о][св]інь 
SFX d ол ле ол 
SFX d ор ре ор 
SFX d ер ре ер 
SFX d ел ле ел 
SFX e Y 19
SFX e о а о 
SFX e о у о 
SFX e о ові о 
SFX e о ом о 
SFX e 0 у [^аєиійоуьюя] 
SFX e 0 ові [^аєиійоуьюяжчшщв] 
SFX e 0 ові [^о]в 
SFX e 0 ом [^аєиійоуьюяжчшщ] 
SFX e 0 і [^аєиійоуьюягґкх] 
SFX e 0 еві [жчшщ] 
SFX e 0 ем [жчшщ] 
SFX e й ю й 
SFX e й єві й 
SFX e й єм й 
SFX e й ї й 
SFX e ь ю ь 
SFX e ь еві ь 
SFX e ь ем ь 
SFX e ь і ь 
SFX f Y 39
SFX f 0 и [^аєиіїйоуьюяжчшщ] 
SFX f 0 ів [^аєиіїйоуьюя] 
SFX f 0 ам [^аєиіїйоуьюя] 
SFX f 0 ами [^аєиіїйоуьюя] 
SFX f 0 ах [^аєиіїйоуьюя] 
SFX f 0 і [жчшщ] 
SFX f о и о 
SFX f о ів о 
SFX f о ам о 
SFX f о ами о 
SFX f о ах о 
SFX f й ї й 
SFX f й їв й 
SFX f й ям й 
SFX f й ями й 
SFX f й ях й 
SFX f ь і ь 
SFX f ь ів ь 
SFX f ь ям ь 
SFX f ь ями ь 
SFX f ь ях ь 
SFX f и ів и 
SFX f і ів і 
SFX f и ам и 
SFX f і ам [^злнрц]і 
SFX f і ям [злнрц]і 
SFX f и ами и 
SFX f і ами [^злнрц]і 
SFX f і ями [злнрц]і 
SFX f и ах и 
SFX f і ах [^злнрц]і 
SFX f і ях [злнрц]і 
SFX f ї їв ї 
SFX f ї ям ї 
SFX f ї ями ї 
SFX f ї ях ї 
SFX f я ів ття 
SFX f я ями я 
SFX f я ях я 
SFX g Y 3
SFX g 0 а [^аєиійоуьюя] 
SFX g й я й 
SFX g ь я ь 
SFX h Y 4
SFX h 0 е [^аєиійоуьюякгжчшщ] 
SFX h к че [уая]к 
SFX h г же [уо]г 
SFX h о е [рл]о 
SFX i Y 47
SFX i ь і ь 
SFX i 0 і [^і][вф] 
SFX i ь ю [^аоуеиіяюєї].ь 
SFX i ь тю [аоуеиіяюєї]ть 
SFX i ь ню [аоуеиіяюєї]нь 
SFX i ь дю [аоуеиіяюєї]дь 
SFX i ь лю [аоуеиіяюєї]ль 
SFX i ь зю [аоуеиіяюєї]зь 
SFX i ь сю [аоуеиіяюєї]сь 
SFX i 0 'ю [^і][вф] 
SFX i 0 і [жчшщр] 
SFX i 0 'ю [ау]р 
SFX i 0 ю [^аоуеиіяюєї][жчшщ] 
SFX i 0 чю [аоуеиіяюєї]ч 
SFX i 0 жю [аоуеиіяюєї]ж 
SFX i 0 шю [аоуеиіяюєї]ш 
SFX i о а о 
SFX i о у о 
SFX i о ом о 
SFX i о і [^кх]о 
SFX i хо сі хо 
SFX i ко ці око 
SFX i е я [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ю [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ем [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е і [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е а [жчшщ]е 
SFX i е у [жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ем [жчшщ]е 
SFX i е і [жчшщ]е 
SFX i я ю я 
SFX i я ям я 
SFX i я і [^'ь]я 
SFX i я ї ['ь]я 
SFX i ий ого ий 
SFX i ий ому ий 
SFX i ий им ий 
SFX i ій ього ій 
SFX i ій ьому ій 
SFX i ій ім ій 
SFX i а ої [втнк]а 
SFX i а ій [втнк]а 
SFX i а у [втнк]а 
SFX i а ою [втнк]а 
SFX i е ого [нк]е 
SFX i е ому [нк]е 
SFX i е им [нк]е 
SFX j Y 64
SFX j ь ей ь 
SFX j ь ям ь 
SFX j ь ями ь 
SFX j ь ях ь 
SFX j 0 ей [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ам [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ами [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ах [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ей [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ям [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ями [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ях [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ей ф 
SFX j 0 ям ф 
SFX j 0 ями ф 
SFX j 0 ях ф 
SFX j ло ел сло 
SFX j о 0 [^с]ло 
SFX j ко ок [^ьоаеиіу]ко 
SFX j о 0 [ьоаеиіу]ко 
SFX j о 0 [^лк]о 
SFX j о ам о 
SFX j о ами о 
SFX j о ах о 
SFX j е ів [^жчшщц]е 
SFX j е ям [^жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ями [^жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ях [^жчшщ]е 
SFX j це дець серце 
SFX j це ець [^с]ерце 
SFX j е ь ісце 
SFX j йце єць йце 
SFX j ьце ець ьце 
SFX j це ець [^йрсь]це 
SFX j е 0 [жшщ]е 
SFX j 0 й че 
SFX j е ам [жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ами [жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ах [жчшщ]е 
SFX j я їв 'я 
SFX j ня ь ння 
SFX j я ів [у]жжя 
SFX j жя 0 [^у]жжя 
SFX j тя ь ття 
SFX j я ь [^т]тя 
SFX j дя ь ддя 
SFX j я ь [^д]дя 
SFX j ля ь лля 
SFX j чя 0 ччя 
SFX j шя 0 шшя 
SFX j ся ь сся 
SFX j я ями я 
SFX j я ях я 
SFX j ий і ий 
SFX j ий их ий 
SFX j ий ими ий 
SFX j і их і 
SFX j і им і 
SFX j і ими і 
SFX j н 0 ин 
SFX j ин 0 ин 
SFX j ин ам ин 
SFX j ин ами ин 
SFX j ин ах ин 
SFX l Y 46
SFX l інь ені о[св]інь 
SFX l ь ню о[св]інь 
SFX l іль олі іль 
SFX l ь лю іль 
SFX l іць оці іць 
SFX l ь цю іць 
SFX l іч ечі [^н]іч 
SFX l іч очі ніч 
SFX l іш оші іш 
SFX l 0 чю іч 
SFX l 0 шю іш 
SFX l ість ості ість 
SFX l їсть йості їсть 
SFX l ь і [^їі]сть 
SFX l ь ю сть 
SFX l 0 ти [^'][ая] 
SFX l 0 ті [^'][ая] 
SFX l 0 м [ая] 
SFX l 0 ти [^м]'я 
SFX l 0 ті [^м]'я 
SFX l 'я ені м'я 
SFX l 'я енем м'я 
SFX l 'я 'ю м'я 
SFX l одець ідця одець 
SFX l одець ідцю одець 
SFX l одець ідцеві одець 
SFX l одець ідцем одець 
SFX l одець ідці одець 
SFX l овець івця овець 
SFX l овець івцю овець 
SFX l овець івцеві овець 
SFX l овець івцем овець 
SFX l овець івці овець 
SFX l 0 у яр 
SFX l 0 ю [аиуе]р 
SFX l 0 еві [аиуяе]р 
SFX l 0 ем [аиуяе]р 
SFX l 0 і [аиуяе]р 
SFX l день ню день 
SFX l день неві день 
SFX l день ні день 
SFX l день нем день 
SFX l тень ню тень 
SFX l тень неві тень 
SFX l тень ні тень 
SFX l тень нем тень 
SFX m Y 76
SFX m інь еней о[св]інь 
SFX m інь еням о[св]інь 
SFX m інь енями о[св]інь 
SFX m інь енях о[св]інь 
SFX m іль олей іль 
SFX m іль олям іль 
SFX m іль олями іль 
SFX m іль олях іль 
SFX m іч ечей [^н]іч 
SFX m іч ечам [^н]іч 
SFX m іч ечами [^н]іч 
SFX m іч ечах [^н]іч 
SFX m іч очей ніч 
SFX m іч очам ніч 
SFX m іч очами ніч 
SFX m іч очах ніч 
SFX m іш ошей іш 
SFX m іш ошам іш 
SFX m іш ошами іш 
SFX m іш ошах іш 
SFX m ість остей ість 
SFX m ість остям ість 
SFX m ість остями ість 
SFX m ість остях ість 
SFX m їсть йостей їсть 
SFX m їсть йостям їсть 
SFX m їсть йостями їсть 
SFX m їсть йостях їсть 
SFX m ь ей [^їі]сть 
SFX m ь ям [^їі]сть 
SFX m ь ями [^їі]сть 
SFX m ь ях [^їі]сть 
SFX m 0 та [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 т [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 там [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 тами [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 тах [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 та п'я 
SFX m 0 т п'я 
SFX m 0 там п'я 
SFX m 0 тами п'я 
SFX m 0 тах п'я 
SFX m 'я ена [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я ен [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я енам [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я енами [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я енах [^п]'я 
SFX m одець ідці одець 
SFX m одець ідців одець 
SFX m одець ідцям одець 
SFX m одець ідцями одець 
SFX m одець ідцях одець 
SFX m овець івці овець 
SFX m овець івців овець 
SFX m овець івцям овець 
SFX m овець івцями овець 
SFX m овець івцях овець 
SFX m 0 і яр 
SFX m 0 ів яр 
SFX m 0 ам яр 
SFX m 0 ами яр 
SFX m 0 ах яр 
SFX m 0 ів [аиуе]р 
SFX m 0 ям [аиуе]р 
SFX m 0 ями [аиуе]р 
SFX m 0 ях [аиуе]р 
SFX m день ні день 
SFX m день нів день 
SFX m день ням день 
SFX m день нями день 
SFX m день нях день 
SFX m тень ні тень 
SFX m тень нів тень 
SFX m тень ням тень 
SFX m тень нями тень 
SFX m тень нях тень 
SFX n Y 9
SFX n інь ене о[св]інь 
SFX n іль оле іль 
SFX n іч ече [^н]іч 
SFX n іч оче ніч 
SFX n іш оше іш 
SFX n ість осте ість 
SFX n їсть йосте їсть 
SFX n ь те [^їі]сть 
SFX n 0 е [аиуя]р 
SFX q Y 4
SFX q 0 а яр 
SFX q 0 я [аиуе]р 
SFX q день ня день 
SFX q тень ня тень 
