HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
агарянин/ejgh
агітфільм/ef
азимут/efg
азіатка/abd
акваріуміст/efg
акула/abd
Алла/ad
альманах/efo
альфонс/efg
амур/efgh
Анна/ad
антибіотик/efg
апарат/efg
Артек/eo
Артем/eghp
атрибут/efg
ацетон/ef
бавовняр/lmq
багатолюддя/i
багатопластинність/l
балабан/ef
банкрут/efgh
барак/efgo
бархатистість/lm
басет/efg
батир/lmq
безкабельність/l
безплатність/lm
безхребетність/lm
бізнесмен/efgh
бізнес-школа/ao
білірубін/efg
біодозиметр/efg
біосигнал/ef
благання/ij
блукання/ij
бляхар/lmq
болючість/lm
борона/ao
Браззавіль/eg
бризковик/efg
бровар/lmq
Буцефал/egh
вагар/lmq
вакуум-апарат/efg
Валенсія/ad
вберігання/i
вебпортал/ef
великотоннажність/l
величність/lmn
вернидуб/eg
взаємини/o
вибірковість/lm
виганяння/ij
Виговський/i
винар/lmq
випарування/i
випущення/ij
вихоплення/i
відворотність/lmZ
відеодані/j
відеотекс/ef
відеотелефон/efg
відносини/o
відпряження/i
військлікар/lmq
Віктор/eghpf
вірність/lmZ
вітрило/ij
влучення/ijZ
внученька/ad
Володимир/eghp
волокно/io
воротар/lmq
впроваджувач/efg
вуглеутворення/i
вульгарність/lm
Гавел/eg
газонасиченість/l
галуження/ij
Гамбург/ego
Гарсія/ad
гекачепіст/efg
Герасим/eghp
гібон/efg
гіпсометр/efg
голіаф/efgh
гоління/ij
головлікар/lmq
гострокутник/efg
грабштихель/efg
Гренадіни/o
гузир/lmq
гусеня/lm
дванадцятигранник/efg
двоєборство/ij
двочастинність/l
Дейв/egh
демімонд/eg
держава/abd
Джеф/egh
дим/ef
дівчинонька/abd
дівчисько/io
діловод/efg
доволочування/i
доладність/lmZ
домагання/ij
дормез/efg
дротар/lmq
друг/egh
дружбини/o
дубуватість/l
Євгенія/ad
Едвард/egh
екзосмос/e
експлуатаційник/efg
електроплуг/efgo
ентомофаг/efg
Ервін/egh
Ернст/eg
жадібність/lm
жаткар/lmq
жертвопринесення/ij
живородіння/ij
житло/io
Жора/ad
загальновживаність/l
загороджувач/efg
закляклість/lm
заліснення/ij
Зальцбург/eo
замішування/i
затворництво/ij
затильник/efg
затюканість/l
звуження/ij
здогадливість/lmZ
зелень/ij
земляк/efgh
зірвиголова/ao
злидар/lmqn
знаменитість/lmn
знеціненість/l
зоїл/eg
Зоя/ad
зубоскальство/ij
інопланетянин/ejgh
інтенсивність/lm
інтернаціонал/ef
каламар/lmq
каналування/ij
капелюх/efgo
Капітон/eghp
карк/eg
карналіт/e
килимар/lmq
кільце/ij
кіль/efg
кінопродюсер/efgh
кінь/abcd
кляп/efg
коваріантність/lm
комплексність/lm
конволют/efg
коробейник/efg
корчмар/lmq
критянин/ejgh
крихітка/abd
крісельце/ij
крок/efo
Лазарчук/eg
лазар/lmq
лактометр/efg
лахміття/ij
легкоплавкість/l
ледар/lmqh
лівр/efg
Лідія/ad
ліхтар/lmq
лускокрилі/j
майстер/abcd
Мануель/eg
Марвін/egh
Марія/ad
медіаресурс/ef
меморіал/ef
методичність/lm
Микита/adp
миловидість/l
миша/ao
містечко/ij
Модест/eghp
молдованин/ejg
монастир/lmq
Моніка/ad
муарування/i
мухомор/efg
налипання/ij
напруженість/lm
напрямленість/l
Нарбут/eg
нарти/o
небо/i
незаймистість/l
ненька/abd
непосидливість/lm
низькість/lm
Нільс/eg
носіння/ij
обізнаність/lZ
облесник/efg
обурення/ij
односельчанин/ejgh
одурманювання/ij
одутлість/lm
Олександра/ad
опошленість/l
орар/lq
особа/ao
офіс/ef
Панас/eghp
пансіонер/efg
Параска/ad
партбілет/efg
перебиття/i
передвижництво/ij
перенаселеність/lm
пересмаженість/l
першодрукар/lmq
півобличчя/i
півслово/io
підстраховування/ij
пісенник/efg
планувальник/efg
платонізм/ef
плугатар/lmq
пляшкар/lmq
подрібнюваність/l
подрібнювання/i
порода/ao
поспішливість/lm
потвора/abd
пофарбування/ij
пред'явник/efg
привітальність/l
прикачування/i
причинність/lm
проводир/lmq
просвічування/ij
протикання/i
протоколіст/efg
прочанин/ejgh
пузирчастість/l
Путивль/eg
ранг/efo
растаман/efg
рибка/abd
ризикованість/lm
рицар/lmq
розмазаність/l
розмазання/ij
розпломбовування/i
розпорядник/efg
рухомість/lmZ
Сава/adp
Саїд/egh
самовар/efg
сантонін/ef
саркофаг/efgo
світіння/ij
світлість/lmn
синьоокість/l
сірник/efg
сіятельство/ij
скупар/lmq
скутість/lm
слово/io
смерека/abd
снікерс/efg
спорадичність/l
стадо/ij
стапель/efg
статс-секретар/lmq
Степан/eghp
стереозвук/efo
страйкар/lmq
стриження/i
стример/efg
сук/efg
Таїса/ad
теплолюбність/l
тернистість/lm
тіточка/abd
товар/ef
товтри/o
токар/lmq
Томсен/eg
том/ef
увільнення/ij
укорочення/ij
умовність/lm
унівалентність/l
фальцет/ef
Фелікс/eghp
фізіолог/efg
філфак/eof
фол/ef
хліборіз/efg
хмеляр/lmq
Христина/ad
царевбивство/ij
цілинник/efg
цуценятко/ij
чинбар/lmq
чоло/io
Шенберг/eg
школяр/lmq
шлір/ef
Шульга/ad
шумливість/lm
Якобсон/eg
Ярослав/eghp
ясноокість/l
